Alabama, session 2026rs, SB35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Sections 33-5-10, 33-5-13, 33-5-14, and
12 33-5-17, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
13 "§33-5-10
14 (a)(1) The secretary shall issue annual certificates of
15 registration directly and shall authorize all judges of
16 probate in the state or any other official in the state who is
17 presently authorized to issue automobile motor vehicle license
18 plates to issue annual certificates of registration and
19 numbers in connection therewith.
20 (2) In conformity with this article and any rules
21 adopted by the secretary, the secretary shall assign to each
22 issuing officer in the county a block of numbers and
23 certificates to each issuing officer in the countywhich upon
24 issue,. theThe issuing officer shall be allowedmay collect a
25 fee of two dollars ($2) for each certificate issued by him or
26 her. In counties where the judge of probate or issuing officer
27 is on the fee system, the issuing fee shall be retained by the
28 judge of probate, and, in counties where the issuing officer
Page 1

judge of probate, and, in counties where the issuing officer
SB35 Enrolled
29 or judge of probate is on a salary basis, the fee shall be
30 paid to the county treasury. The issuance fee shall be in
31 addition to the amount of the boat vessel registration fee
32 provided in Section 33-5-17.
33 (b) All registration moneymonies collected from the
34 registration of vessels, except the two dollar ($2) issuance
35 fee allowed under subsectionsubdivision (a)(2), shall be
36 remitted monthly to ALEA not later than 10 days after the
37 first of each month. The secretary shall remit the
38 registration moneythese funds to the State TreasurerTreasury
39 to be deposited in the State Water Safety Fundas provided in
40 subsection (c).
41 (c)(1) Five dollars ($5) from each registration fee
42 provided in Section 33-5-17(a)(2)(i) through (iv) shall be
43 remitted monthly to the State Treasury and deposited into the
44 State Reservoir Management Grant Fund, established in Section
45 9-2-170, not later than 10 days after the first of each month.
46 (2) Unless otherwise provided by law, the remainder of
47 the monies collected pursuant to this article, excluding the
48 issuance fee provided in subsection (a) and the distribution
49 provided in subdivision (c)(1), shall be remitted monthly to
50 the State Treasury and deposited in the State Water Safety
51 Fund.
52 (3) All monies received out of the sale of
53 licensescollected from the registrations of vessels and
54 deposited in the State Water Safety Fund under this article
55 may be used by the secretary for all purposes reasonably
56 necessary in the cost of administration of this article,
Page 2

necessary in the cost of administration of this article,
SB35 Enrolled
57 including the printing of certificates of registration,
58 postage and transportation charges, clerical, personnel,
59 equipment purchases, salaries, and other expenses for each
60 year; except, that no funds collected under this article may
61 be used to supplement or pay the salaries of any law
62 enforcement officers other than those hired specifically for
63 the purposes of administering this article. The secretary
64 shall expend the monies appropriated to the Marine Patrol
65 Division as the secretary deems necessary and appropriate;
66 provided, however, that the appropriations may be expended
67 only for the purposes designated by the Legislature and in the
68 amounts provided therefor in the general appropriation bill
69 and shall be budgeted and allotted in accordance with Article
70 4 of Chapter 4 of Title 41. It is the intent of the
71 Legislature that the agency utilize existing personnel and
72 equipment of the agency and of the sheriffs of this state to
73 the maximum possible extent in enforcing and administering
74 this article, to the end that there be no costly duplication
75 of services."
76 "§33-5-13
77 (a) EveryExcept as provided in subsection (b), each
78 certificate of registration and license as provided for in
79 this article is to shall be issued on a yearly basis and said
80 certificate and license shall be valid for one issuing year
81 only as provided in this article.
82 (b) The registration of vessels shall be on a staggered
83 basis. To implement this article, the registration of vessels
84 may be for periods of less than or greater than 12 months
Page 3

may be for periods of less than or greater than 12 months
SB35 Enrolled
85 during the conversion year onlyThe initial certificate of
86 registration may be issued in any month and for a period less
87 than one year.
88 (c) The staggered system for registration of vessels
89 shall be implemented thusly: The first letter of an
90 individual's last name shall determine the month in which aA
91 vessel owner shall registerrenew the registration of his or
92 her vessel(s), as indicated below during the month assigned to
93 the first letter of the vessel owner's last name, as follows:
94 January.................................A,D
95 February..............................B
96 March...................................C, E
97 April......................................F, G, N
98 May.......................................H, O
99 June......................................M, I
100 July........................................P, L
101 August.................................J, K, R
102 September.........................Q, S, T
103 October...............................U, V, W, X, Y, Z,
104 to include livery boats, dealers, and manufacturers
105 January: A, D
106 February: B
107 March: C, E
108 April: F, G, N
109 May: H, O
110 June: M, I
111 July: P, L
112 August: J, K, R
Page 4

August: J, K, R
SB35 Enrolled
113 September: Q, S, T
114 October: U, V, W, X, Y, Z, to include livery boats,
115 dealers, and manufacturers
116 (d)After the conversion period all owners of vessels
117 shall continue to register their vessels during the month
118 assigned to the first initial of their last name. All
119 registrations issued on a staggered basis shall expire on the
120 last day of the month whichthat precedes the registration
121 month assigned for the purchase or renewal of
122 registrationprovided in subsection (c). All registrations
123 issued to vessels for which registration is due in October and
124 November shall expire on September 30."
125 "§33-5-14
126 (a) The description of the vessel of a manufacturer or
127 dealer shall be omitted from the certificate of registration
128 since the number awarded may be used on different vessels at
129 different times. In lieu of the vessel's description, the word
130 "manufacturer" or "dealer," as appropriate, shall be plainly
131 marked on each certificate of registration.
132 (b) The manufacturer or dealer may have the number
133 awarded printed upon or attached to a removable sign or signs
134 to be temporarily but firmly mounted upon or attached to the
135 vessel being demonstrated or tested so long asif the display
136 meets the requirements of this article.
137 (c) A certificate of registration and the corresponding
138 number issued pursuant to this section may only be used for
139 vessels being demonstrated or tested."
140 "§33-5-17
Page 5

"§33-5-17
SB35 Enrolled
141 (a)(1) Vessels subject to this article, including
142 livery boats, shall be classified as provided in subdivision
143 (2). according to the following schedule and annual fees
144 charged by the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency for
145 registration shall be in the following amounts
146 (2) The amount of the vessel registration fee for each
147 class is established as follows:
148 (i) CLASS 1. Vessels Lessless than 16 feet in length,:
149 eighteentwenty-three dollars ($18)($23) plus a two dollar ($2)
150 issuance fee.
151 (ii) CLASS 2. Vessels Sixteen16 feet or over and less
152 than 26 feet in length,: twenty-threetwenty-eight dollars
153 ($23)($28) plus a two dollar ($2) issuance fee.
154 (iii) CLASS 3. Vessels Twenty-six26 feet or over and
155 less than 40 feet in length,: seventy-threeseventy-eight
156 dollars ($73)($78) plus a two dollar ($2) issuance fee.
157 (iv) CLASS 4. Vessels Forty40 feet or over in length,:
158 ninety-eightone hundred three dollars ($98)($103) plus a two
159 dollar ($2) issuance fee.
160 The above stated fees shall also apply to livery boats.
161 (v) CLASS 5. Dealer or manufacturer vessels;: temporary
162 license, twenty-three dollars ($23) plus a two dollar ($2)
163 issuance fee for each license.
164 (3) The issuance fee provided in Section 33-5-10(a)
165 shall be in addition to the vessel registration fee provided
166 in subdivision (2).
167 (b) In addition to the foregoing fees, there shall be
168 anAn inspection fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) is
Page 6

anAn inspection fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) is
SB35 Enrolled
169 established for all homemade boats which require a hull
170 identification number. This fee shall be in addition to any
171 other fee provided by law.
172 (c) In addition to the foregoing fees, there shall be
173 an additional registration fee of five dollars ($5) for every
174 Class 1 through 4 vessel registered. All monies received from
175 the additional registration fee provided under this subsection
176 shall be remitted monthly to the State Treasurer to be
177 deposited into the State Reservoir Management Grant Fund not
178 later than 10 days after the first of each month."
179 Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
180 1, 2027.
Page 7

1, 2027.
SB35 Enrolled
181
182
183
184
185
186
187 ________________________________________________
188 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
189
190
191
192 ________________________________________________
193 Speaker of the House of Representatives
194
195
196 SB35
197 Senate 15-Jan-26
198 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
199 the Senate.
200
201 Patrick Harris,
202 Secretary.
203
204
205
206
207 House of Representatives
208 Passed: 03-Feb-26
209
210
211
212
213 By: Senator Kitchens
Page 8